Hawaii statutes.
§664-26 Government lands. This part
shall not be so construed as to allow any person owning or otherwise interested
in land adjoining government land to compel the government to join in the cost
of erecting or maintaining a fence on the boundary line between such lands.
However, the government or any lessee or occupant of government land, with the
consent of the governor, shall have the same right accorded to others to compel
action according to this part by any person owning, leasing, or occupying land
adjoining government land, or by any lessee or occupant of adjoining government
land, and every lessee or occupant of government land shall be subject to the
duties and obligations of other lessees and occupants as provided by this part.
[L 1931, c 101, §6; RL 1935, §3676; am L 1935, c 52, §4; RL 1945, §10217; RL
1955, §234-25; HRS §664-26; am L 1972, c 90, §6(k)]

Previous
Vol13_Ch0601-0676
Next